Connecticut, session 2026, SB00388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 3-55i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) There is established the "Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan
Fund" which shall be a separate nonlapsing fund. All funds received by
the state of Connecticut from the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe pursuant
to the joint memorandum of understanding entered into by and
between the state and the [tribe] Mashantucket Pequot Tribe on January
13, 1993, as amended on April 30, 1993, and any successor thereto, or
from the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut pursuant to the
memorandum of understanding entered into by and between the state
and the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut on May 17, 1994, as
amended from time to time, shall be deposited in the General Fund.
[During the fiscal year]
(2) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2015, [and each fiscal year
thereafter] to June 30, 2027, inclusive, from the funds received by the
state from the tribe pursuant to said joint memorandum of
understanding, as amended, and any successor thereto, an amount
equal to the appropriation to the Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 388
Fund for Grants to Towns shall be transferred to the Mashantucket
Pequot and Mohegan Fund and shall be distributed by the Office of
Policy and Management, during said fiscal [year] years, in accordance
with the provisions of section 3-55j. For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred fifty-two million three
hundred seventy-eight thousand six hundred seventy-six dollars of the
funds deposited in the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be transferred from the General Fund to the
Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan Fund. During each fiscal year, the
Office of Policy and Management shall make distributions of any funds
transferred to the Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan Fund pursuant
to this section in accordance with the provisions of section 3-55j. The
amount of the grant payable to each municipality during any fiscal year,
in accordance with [said] section 3-55j, shall be reduced proportionately
if the total of such grants exceeds the amount of funds available for such
year. The grant shall be paid in three installments as follows: The
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall, annually, not
later than the fifteenth day of December, the fifteenth day of March and
the fifteenth day of June certify to the Comptroller the amount due each
municipality under the provisions of section 3-55j and the Comptroller
shall draw an order on the Treasurer on or before the fifth business day
following the fifteenth day of December, the fifth business day
following the fifteenth day of March and the fifth business day
following the fifteenth day of June and the Treasurer shall pay the
amount thereof to such municipality on or before the first day of
January, the first day of April and the thirtieth day of June.
(b) The transfers from the General Fund to the Mashantucket Pequot
and Mohegan Fund required by subsection (a) of this section shall not
be reduced except upon submission to the General Assembly by the
Governor of a certification of an emergency requiring such reduction.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 3-55i
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 388
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3